Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights

§ 1. Power inherent in the people.

All power is inherent in the people, and all free governments are founded on their authority, and instituted for their peace, safety and happiness; for the advancement of these ends they have at all times an inalienable and indefeasible right to alter, reform or abolish the government in such manner as they may think proper.

Construction. —

Art. 1, § 1, Wyo. Const., recognizes the ultimate right of the people to alter, reform, or abolish government, through peaceful means or otherwise, but when read in pari materia with the rest of the constitution, it does not contemplate the adoption of laws under the existing government, whether by legislation or initiative, other than through constitutionally established means. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

While
Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 1 recognizes the ultimate right of the people to alter, reform, or abolish government, that right must be exercised in accordance with the constitution. Reading art. 1, § 1 in pari materia with other relevant constitutional provisions, the framers intended that laws altering the government would be adopted only through the constitutional amendment process. Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14, 294 P.3d 895,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

Local self-government to be given effect. —

The supreme court must give effect to local self-government insofar at least as required by constitution, at the same time remembering that it is the court's duty to uphold a legislative act, to the extent that is reasonably possible. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1925).

Quoted

in

Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Clouse v. State, 776 P.2d 1011,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures, 81 ALR3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway, 81 ALR3d 564.

Implied cause of action for damages for violation of provisions of state constitutions, 75 ALR5th 619.

What constitutes reverse sex or gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — Nonemployment cases, 166 ALR Fed 1.

§ 2. Equality of all.

In their inherent right to life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness, all members of the human race are equal.

Rights are relative. —

Neither property rights nor contract rights are absolute, but such rights are relative. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

The rights protected by this section are not absolutes and do not preclude imposition, by decision or statute, of such reasonable restrictions, on those rights as are in the public interest. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Arbitrary and invidious discrimination condemned. —

This section does not require exact equality. Only arbitrary and invidious discrimination is condemned. Cavanagh v. State, 505 P.2d 311,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1973).

Bald assertions of discrimination are insufficient. —

A person contesting the constitutionality of a statute must do more than make bald assertions of what he thinks is discriminatory. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963); United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Equal protection claims test. —

The four aspects of the test for analyzing state constitution equal protection claims inquire as to (1) what class is harmed by the legislation and has that group been subjected to a tradition of disfavor by our laws; (2) what is the public purpose to be served by the law; (3) what is the characteristic of the disadvantaged class that justifies disparate treatment; and (4) how are the characteristics used to distinguish people for disparate treatment relevant to the purpose the challenged law purportedly intends to serve. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Burden on assailant to show classification is arbitrary. —

One who assails the classification in a law must carry the burden of showing that it does not rest upon any reasonable basis, but is essentially arbitrary. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963).

It is appellant's burden to show that it has been subjected to disparate treatment, resulting in a denial of equal protection. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Public school principal failed to meet his burden of showing that his statements made to the board of education on the career education program and football reserved ticket sales were constitutionally protected or the substantial or motivating factor for his termination. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Criminal law cannot be lacking in definition. —

The constitutional guarantee of equal rights under the law will not tolerate a criminal law so lacking in definition that each defendant is left to the vagaries of individual judges and juries. State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Grand jury constitutional. —

The perceived advantages which flow from the procedure involving a complaint and preliminary examination followed by an information do not justify a conclusion that a defendant is denied equal protection of the law because a grand jury is used. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Wyoming is not committed to absolute uniformity in sentencing

for criminal offenses. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

First degree murder for child abuse. —

Defendant's prosecution for felony murder under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

, based on his abuse of a child under 16, rather than for child abuse, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-503

, did not violate equal protection, under this section, or Wyo. Const. art. I, § 34, as the provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

allowing a first degree murder prosecution for child abuse gives fair notice that life imprisonment or execution is a possible penalty. Johnson v. State, 2003 WY 9, 61 P.3d 1234,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Feb. 18, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 841, 124 S. Ct. 108, 157 L. Ed. 2d 74, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 5710 (U.S. 2003).

Placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation. —

Although the prosecutor gave no reason for the state's refusal to consent to treatment under §

7-13-301

(placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation), the prosecutor, not the judge, controls the prosecution up to adjudication, and the court will not presume that suspect factors or arbitrary classifications exist. Thus, the refusal to consent to sentencing under §

7-13-301

was not arbitrary or an abuse of discretion. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990); Gezzi v. State, 800 P.2d 485,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1990); Kruzich v. State, 800 P.2d 489,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1990).

Sex offender registration for juveniles.—

Sex offender registration for juveniles did not violate the Equal Protection Clause in Wyo. Const. art. I, § 2, as juveniles were afforded the same opportunity as adults to enter into a consent decree deferring their respective cases and have them discharged and never adjudicated delinquent. Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Criminal acquittees are dissimilar to civil acquittees for equal protection purposes. —

A criminal acquittee has placed his mental illness at issue, proved it by a preponderance of the evidence, and committed a criminal act. Such important differences render a criminal acquittee dissimilar to a civil committee for equal protection purposes. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated for equal protection purposes. —

The defendant argued that he was being treated differently from a person who was serving the same amount of time in the state penitentiary because those in prison were afforded opportunities such as good time, vocational and educational programs, merit programs, library and recreational facilities and therapy programs which were not available in the county jail; however, this equal protection claim failed because felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated persons for purposes of identification of a classification of similarly situated persons who are being treated differently. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Negligence immunity of co-employees unconstitutional. —

The statute which, under the Wyoming worker's compensation scheme, grants immunity from suits by co-employees to employees who were acting within the scope of their employment, §

27-14-104

, is unconstitutional because it violates the Wyoming Constitution's guarantee of equal protection. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992).

Right of illegitimate infant to claim and recover damages for parent's wrongful death. —

Wyoming's wrongful death statute cannot constitutionally deny an illegitimate infant the right to claim and recover damages for the wrongful death of his or her parent. Jordan v. Delta Drilling Co., 541 P.2d 39,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1975), overruled, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984).

Right to choose to belong or not to belong to a union

is included in the guaranty of liberty and pursuit of happiness. Hagen v. Culinary Workers Alliance Local, 70 Wyo. 165, 246 P.2d 778,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1952).

Right to associate with one's family is a fundamental liberty under Wyoming constitution.

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Gender-based classifications are not ipso facto invalid.

A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

And failure to give father same procedure to establish paternity as mother constitutional. —

The failure to give the biological father the same procedure to establish paternity or nonpaternity as is given to the mother does not unconstitutionally deprive the father of due process of law nor equal protection of the law by virtue of an impermissible gender-based classification. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Classifications based on improper criteria of legitimacy or illegitimacy

constitute denial of equal protection. Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

And no legitimate state interest is served by discrimination between legally married spouses.

Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

Private School Licensing Act. —

No classification had been created by the Private School Licensing Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

, and it was unnecessary to do any further analysis under the test where those institutions that were already accredited obviously did not have to apply to become accredited, and those institutions that were not accredited had to become accredited within the time frame provided; therefore, no equal protection violation occurred because different classifications were not created under the act or the rules adopted by the Wyoming Department of Education. Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act (§

9-2-1501

et seq.) (repealed in 2005) is unconstitutional

because it violates the equal protection clause of the state constitution. The act is not rationally related to protection of the public health or economic and social stability of the state. Also, the legislature's use of the law to protect one class of people from financial difficulties, while it dilutes the rights under the constitution of another class of people, cannot be condoned.
Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988).

Mental Health Professions Practice Act violates equal protection. —

Under the Mental Health Professions Practice Act, private counselors rights to equal protection have been transgressed; none of the evidence demonstrates that supervision by public, licensed counselors results in the qualification of counselors who are more competent or more ethical and, thus, more likely to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. The differentiation of the public employer or the charitable employer from the private, for-profit employer cannot be justified as a proper classification and, thus, is not a legitimate exercise in police power. This classification is not founded on a reasonable basis, is arbitrary, and constitutes unwarranted discrimination. It is a violation of equal protection and must be set aside. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

The mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Legislature may not prohibit occupations, unless they are detrimental

to public welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Prohibiting uninvited visitation of private residences by solicitors. —

Ordinance declaring uninvited visitation of private residences by solicitors, peddlers, itinerant merchants and others, for the purpose of soliciting orders for or selling goods, wares and merchandise, a nuisance and imposing a penalty, is valid exercise of the police power. Town of Green River v. Bunger, 50 Wyo. 52, 58 P.2d 456,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1936).

Prohibition of water variances not unconstitutional. —

A prohibition of water variances does not violate art. 1, § 7, Wyo. Const., in that it is an exercise of absolute and arbitrary power; does not deny due process by denying a fair opportunity to challenge applicable water quality standards; and does not deny equal protection of the laws by discriminating between water and other pollutant dischargers. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

There are rational reasons to distinguish between water and other pollutant dischargers, including: the different nature of the natural resources; the difference in the number of pollutant dischargers within each class; and the difference in the extent of damage which can result from the various discharges. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Application of the rule against holding incompatible offices,

whether by the common law or legislative enactment, does not result in an unconstitutional infringement of personal and political rights. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Regulation of use of highways. —

State or municipal highway regulations must be reasonable, operate with equality and have some tendency to accomplish object in view. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Courts must determine in first instance whether legislature may prohibit use of highways in particular case, and whether regulation amounting to prohibition is reasonable. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Control of highways may in proper cases be extended to prohibiting their use, and legislature may subject private carriers to appropriate regulations. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Statute prohibiting use of highways by motor transportation companies, except under certificate and subject to regulation and supervision by public service commission, is void as applied to private carriers. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Statutory regulations making for safety in the operation of all motor vehicles on the highways are clearly within the authority of the state, which may demand compensation for the special facilities which it has provided to promote the public safety without violation of this section. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Seat belt usage provision does not violate equal protection laws. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f) does not violate the equal protection clauses of either the United States nor the Wyoming Constitutions under rational review basis; the statute's purpose is to encourage seat belt use while limiting the penalties for seat belt nonuse and preserving the right to compensation for accidents caused by negligent tortfeasors, and it is conceivable that § 31-5-1402(f) serves the purposes for which it was enacted. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Suspension of license violated equal protection guarantees. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and § 31-7-128(f), which provide for the driver's license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, violate the Wyoming Constitution's equal protection guarantees. Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Suspension of commercial driving privileges. —

Driver, who had his driver's license suspended for driving while under the influence while driving his personal noncommercial motor vehicle, was not deprived of his equal protection rights when, because he held a commercial driver's license, he was not granted a probationary driver's license because of §

31-17-105

(now repealed); the legislative concern with safety will remain and be legitimate regardless of the makeup or characteristics of individuals in the regulated group. Wilson v. State, 841 P.2d 90,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1992).

Requirement that railroads fence rights-of-way is not discriminatory. —

The fact that railroads are required to fence their rights-of-way while motor transports are not required to fence a highway right-of-way is not discriminatory so as to make the requirement unconstitutional. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Constitutionality of §

14-6-203

. —

The statutory scheme of §

14-6-203

is constitutional; there is no demonstrable prejudice arising out of the failure to assign the burden of proof prior to any hearing; and there was no abuse of discretion on the part of the trial judge in refusing to transfer case to juvenile court or on the part of the trial judge in transferring another case to the county court from juvenile court for a preliminary examination with the view that the case would be prosecuted in the district court. Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Stalking statute constitutional. —

The specific provision of §

6-2-506

making stalking a felony if committed in violation of any condition of probation, parole, or bail is not unconstitutionally vague and does not violate the defendant's right to equal protection. Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

Mealey v. City of Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970); DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980); State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 70 Wyo. 193, 246 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1952); State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991); GWJ v. MH, 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996); Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

, 15 L.R.A. (n.s.) 227 (1908); Bowers v. Getter Trucking Co., 514 P.2d 837,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1973); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976); Hampton v. State, 558 P.2d 504,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1977); Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977); Mayland v. State, 568 P.2d 897,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1977); Great W. Sugar Co. v. Johnson, 624 P.2d 1184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1981); Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983); Bridge v. Eisenman Transp., Inc., 742 P.2d 768,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 510

(Wyo. 1987); Allen v. Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. One, 811 P.2d 1,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1991); Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Comp. Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998); RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999); EBH v. Hot Springs Dep't of Family Servs., 2001 WY 100, 33 P.3d 172,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2001); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003); In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. Apr. 6, 2006); DT v. State, 2017 WY 36, 391 P.3d 1136,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requiring apology as “affirmative action” or other form of redress under state Civil Rights Act, 85 ALR3d 402.

Prohibition, under state civil rights laws, of racial discrimination in rental of privately owned residential property, 96 ALR3d 497.

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females, 5 ALR4th 708.

Validity of ordinance restricting number of unrelated persons who can live together in residential zone, 12 ALR4th 238.

Sex discrimination in treatment of jail or prison inmates, 12 ALR4th 1219.

Constitutionality of gender-based classifications in criminal laws proscribing nonsupport of spouse or child, 14 ALR4th 717.

On-the-job sexual harassment as violation of state civil rights law, 18 ALR4th 328.

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

Validity of state statute providing for termination of parental rights, 22 ALR4th 774.

Refusal to rent residential premises to persons with children as unlawful discrimination, 30 ALR4th 1187.

Applicability and application of zoning regulations to single residences employed for group living of mentally retarded persons, 32 ALR4th 1018.

Race as factor in adoption proceedings, 34 ALR4th 167.

Validity and application of statute exempting nonmanagerial, nonfinancially interested employees from obscenity prosecution, 35 ALR4th 1237.

Validity of state statute or local ordinance requiring, or giving preference to, the employment of residents by contractors or subcontractors engaged in, or awarded contracts for, the construction of public works or improvements, 36 ALR4th 941.

Validity and construction of state statute or rule allowing or changing rate of prejudgment interest in tort actions, 40 ALR4th 147.

Validity and construction of products liability statute precluding or limiting recovery where product has been altered or modified after leaving hands of manufacturer or seller, 41 ALR4th 47.

Validity of state statute providing for periodic payment of future damages in medical malpractice action, 41 ALR4th 275.

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provision prohibiting sales of commodities below cost — modern cases, 41 ALR4th 612.

Validity, construction and application, in nonstatutory personal injury actions, of state statute providing for borrowing of statute of limitations of another state, 41 ALR4th 1025.

Validity, construction and application of enactment, implementation or repeal of formal educational requirement for admission to the bar, 44 ALR4th 910.

Court appointment of attorney to represent, without compensation indigent in civil action, 52 ALR4th 1063.

Nonconsensual treatment of involuntarily committed mentally ill persons with neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs as violative of state constitutional guaranty, 74 ALR4th 1099.

Validity, construction, application, and effect of statute requiring conditions, in addition to expiration of time, for reinstatement of suspended or revoked driver's license 2 ALR5th 725.

Validity of state or local gross receipts tax on gambling, 21 ALR5th 812.

Voir dire exclusions of men from state trial jury or jury panel — Post-J.E.B. v. Alabama ex rel T.B., 511 U.S. 127, 114 S. Ct. 1419, 128 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 3121, cases, 88 ALR5th 67.

Federal and state constitutional provisions as prohibiting discrimination in employment on basis of gay, lesbian, or bisexual sexual orientation or conduct, 96 ALR5th 391.

Federal and state constitutional provisions and state statutes as prohibiting employment discrimination based on heterosexual conduct or relationship, 123 ALR 5th 411.

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Effect of broadcaster's employment practices on renewal of broadcaster's radio license, 56 ALR Fed 49.

Sex discrimination in United States Armed Forces, 56 ALR Fed 850.

Effect of broadcaster's employment practices on renewal of broadcaster's television license, 57 ALR Fed 16.

When will federal government employee be excused from 30-day limitation period, established by equal employment opportunity commission regulation (29 CFR § 1613.214(a)(1)(i)), for bringing matters relating to employment discrimination to attention of equal employment opportunity counselor, 57 ALR Fed 116.

Propriety of federal court's ordering state or local tax increase to effectuate civil right decree, 76 ALR Fed 504.

What constitutes violation of 18 USC § 245(b), prohibiting interference with civil rights, 76 ALR Fed 816.

Eligibility of illegitimate child for survivor's benefits under Social Security Act, pursuant to § 216(h)(2)(A) of Act (42 USC § 416(h)(2)(A)), where state intestacy law denying inheritance right, or application of that state law to § 216(h)(2)(A), may violate child's right to equal protection of laws, 116 ALR Fed 121.

Availability of Nominal Damages in Action Under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS §§ 2000e et seq.), 143 ALR Fed 269.

Sex discrimination in public education under Title IX — Supreme Court cases, 158 ALR Fed 563.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — nonemployment cases 152 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes reverse sex or gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — Nonemployment cases, 166 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — Public employment cases, 168 ALR Fed 1.

Equal protection and due process clause challenges based on racial discrimination — Supreme Court cases, 172 ALR Fed 1.